Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.625

Voting by inactive or canceled voters.

(1) A voter whose registration has been made inactive under this chapter and who requests to vote at an ensuing election before two federal general elections have been held must be allowed to vote a regular ballot applicable to the voter's current residence address, and the voter's registration record updated and restored to active status.

(2) An eligible voter whose registration has been properly canceled under this chapter shall be allowed to register to vote at the voter's current residence address.

[ 2023 c 466 s 24; 2009 c 369 s 30; 2003 c 111 s 240; 1994 c 57 s 47. Formerly RCW 29.10.220.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.